noun.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
! For noun stuff
+NOUN
+BIG
+SMALL
+PL
+SG
+SoCalled
+apparent
+definite
+1PERS
+2PERS
+3PERS
+close ! how close the speaker is to the object
+far
+locative
+from
+DueTo
+intended

! For verbal stuff (prefixes)
+VERB

! For I, you, he/she/it/, we, you, they we use the markers from the noun stuff,
! e. g. +1PERS+PL for we when we the subject.
! What follows here are markers for the object.
+NONE
+ME
+YOUSG ! you as object in singular
+IT !(or HIM, OR HER)
+US
+YOUPL ! you as object in plural
+THEM

! For verbal stuff (suffixes)
+oneself
+oneanother
+need
+willing
+prepared
+setup
+afraid
+statechange
+resume
+cause
+indefiniteSubject
+ability
+clearly
+certainly
+apparently
+perfective
+done
+continuous
+progressing
+when
+if
+before
+while
+for
+which
+interrogative
+oneWhoDoes

LEXICON Root
	SuS	Noun; ! wind
  qoH @U.type.being@ Noun; ! fool
	Qagh	Noun; ! error, mistake
	woQ	Noun; ! authority, power
	Verbprefix; 
	
LEXICON Verbprefix
! Verb suffix table 
!				 OBJECT 	  	  	  	  	 
!  	  	None 	me 	you 	Him/her/it 	us 	you 	them
!  	I 	jI- 	- 	qa- 	vI- 		- 	Sa- 	vI-
!  	You 	BI- 	cho- 	- 	Da- 		ju- 	- 	Da-
! SUBJ	It/(S)He 0 	mu- 	Du- 	0 		nu- 	lI- 	0
!  	We 	Ma’- 	- 	pI- 	wI- 		- 	re- 	DI-
! 	You 	Su- 	tu- 	- 	bo- 		che- 	- 	Bo-
!  	They 	0 	mu- 	nI- 	lu- 		nu- 	lI- 	0
! Source: http://www.judion.de/klingon/
	!---------------------------------------------------------------
	! First person (sg) is subject:
	+SG+1PERS+NONE:jI Verb; 
	! +SG+1PERS+ME w/o prefix; implemented via suffix
	+SG+1PERS+YOUSG:qa Verb;
	+SG+1PERS+IT:vI Verb;
	! +SG+1PERS+US w/o prefix; implemented via suffix
	+SG+1PERS+YOUPL:Sa Verb;
	+SG+1PERS+THEM:vI Verb;
	!---------------------------------------------------------------
	! Second person (sg) is subject:
	+SG+2PERS+NONE:BI Verb;
	+SG+2PERS+ME:cho Verb;
	! +SG+2PERS+YOUSG w/o prefix; implemented via suffix
	+SG+2PERS+IT:Da Verb;
	+SG+2PERS+US:ju Verb;
	! +SG+2PERS+YOUPL w/o prefix; implemented via suffix
	+SG+2PERS+THEM:Da Verb;
	!---------------------------------------------------------------
	! Third person (sg) is subject:
	+SG+3PERS+NONE:0 Verb;
	+SG+3PERS+ME:mu Verb;
	+SG+3PERS+YOUSG:Du Verb;
	+SG+3PERS+IT:0 Verb;
	+SG+3PERS+US:nu Verb;
	+SG+3PERS+YOUPL:lI Verb;
	+SG+3PERS+THEM:0 Verb;
	!---------------------------------------------------------------
	! First person (pl) is subject:
	+PL+1PERS+NONE:Ma' Verb;
	! +PL+1PERS+ME w/o prefix, implemented via suffix
	+PL+1PERS+YOUSG:pI Verb;
	+PL+1PERS+IT:wI Verb;
	! +PL+1PERS+US w/o prefix; implemented via suffix
	+PL+1PERS+YOUPL:re Verb;
	+PL+1PERS+THEM:DI Verb;
	!---------------------------------------------------------------
	! Second person (pl) is subject:
	+PL+2PERS+NONE:Su Verb;
	+PL+2PERS+ME:tu Verb;
	! +PL+2PERS+YOUSG w/o prefix; implemented via suffix
	+PL+2PERS+IT:bo Verb;
	+PL+2PERS+US:che Verb;
	! +PL+2PERS+YOUPL w/o prefix; implemented via suffix
	+PL+2PERS+THEM:Bo Verb;
	!---------------------------------------------------------------
	! Third person (pl) is subject:
	+PL+3PERS+NONE:0 Verb;
	+PL+3PERS+ME:mu Verb;
	+PL+3PERS+YOUSG:nI Verb;
	+PL+3PERS+IT:lu Verb;
	+PL+3PERS+US:nu Verb;
	+PL+3PERS+YOUPL:lI Verb;
	+PL+3PERS+THEM:0 Verb;
	!---------------------------------------------------------------
	! For the verbs w/o prefixes	
	Verb;
	!---------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON Verb
  +VERB:0 VerbStems;

LEXICON VerbStems
	vut Vtype1; ! cook
	Qoy Vtype1; ! hear

LEXICON Noun
  +NOUN:0 Ntype1;

LEXICON Ntype1
  +BIG:'a' Ntype2;
  +SMALL:Hom Ntype2;
  Ntype2;
	
LEXICON Ntype2
  +PL:pu' @U.type.being@ Ntype3;
  +PL:Du' @U.type.body@ Ntype3;
  +PL:mey @U.type.else@ Ntype3;
  +SG:0 Ntype3;

LEXICON Ntype3
  +SoCalled:qoq Ntype4;
  +apparent:Hey Ntype4;
  +definite:na' Ntype4;
  Ntype4;

LEXICON Ntype4
  +1PERS:wIj Ntype5;
  +2PERS:lIj Ntype5;
  +3PERS:Daj Ntype5;
  +1PERS:wl' @U.type.being@ Ntype5; ! TODO overgenerates
  +2PERS:lI' @U.type.being@ Ntype5;
  +close:vam Ntype5;
  +far:vetlh Ntype5;
  Ntype5;

LEXICON Ntype5
  +locative:Daq #;
  +from:vo' #;
  +DueTo:mo' #;
  +intended:vaD #;
	#;

! Oneself / one another
LEXICON Vtype1
	+oneself:'egh Vtype2;
	+oneanother:chuq Vtype2;
	Vtype2;

! Volition / predisposition
LEXICON Vtype2
	+need:nlS Vtype3;
	+qang:willing Vtype3;
	+prepared:rup Vtype3; ! in the sense of readiness
	+setup:beH Vtype3;    ! in the sense of readiness
	+afraid:vlp Vtype3;
	Vtype3;

! Change
LEXICON Vtype3
	+statechange:choH Vtype4;
	+resume:qa' Vtype4;
	Vtype4;

! Cause
LEXICON Vtype4
	+cause:moH Vtype5;
	Vtype5;

! Indefinite subject / ability (independend of each other)
LEXICON Vtype5
	+indefiniteSubject:lu' Vtype6;
	+ability:laH Vtype6; ! in the sense of could / being able to
	Vtype6;

! Qualification
LEXICON Vtype6
	+clearly:chu' Vtype7; ! also: perfectly
	+certainly:bej Vtype7; ! also: undoubtedly
	+apparently:law' Vtype7;
	Vtype7;

! Aspect
LEXICON Vtype7
	+perfective:pu' Vtype8;	
	+done:ta' Vtype8;
	+continuous:taH Vtype8;	
	+progressing:lH' Vtype8;
	Vtype8;

! Honorific
LEXICON Vtype8
	+honorific:neS Vtype9;
	Vtype9;

! Syntactic markers
LEXICON Vtype9
	+when:Dl' #;
	+if:chugh #;
	+before:pa' #;
	+while:vlS #;
	+for:meH #;
	+which:bogh #;
	+interrogative:'a' #;	
	+oneWhoDoes:wl' #; ! one who does, or something that does
